Hawaii statutes.
§264-64 Design of controlled-access
facility and regulation, restriction, or prohibition of access; penalty.
The director of transportation may so design any controlled-access facility and
so regulate, restrict, or prohibit access as to best serve the traffic for
which such facility is intended. In this connection, the director may divide
and separate any controlled-access facility into separate roadways by the
construction of raised curbing, central dividing sections, or other physical
separations, or by designating the separate roadways by signs, markers,
stripes, and the proper lane for the traffic by appropriate signs, markers,
stripes, and other devices.

No person shall have any right of ingress or
egress to, from, or across controlled-access facilities to or from abutting
lands, except at the designated points at which access may be permitted, upon
such terms and conditions as may be specified by the director. Any person who
violates this section shall be fined not more than $250 or imprisoned not more
than three months, or both. [L 1960, c 3, pt of §2; Supp, §111-45; HRS §264-64;
gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next